Georgia, session 2025_26, HB900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 47-23-64 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to transfer of
funds from the Employees' Retirement System of Georgia to the Georgia Judicial Retirement
System by superior court judges, district attorneys, or solicitors-general and crediting service,
is amended by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1) Any superior court judge, state court judge, solicitor general, or district attorney
member of this retirement system who was previously an active member of the
Employees' Retirement System of Georgia may elect to have all contributions made by
or on behalf of such member transferred from such retirement system to this retirement
H. B. 900
- 1 -

LC 56 0400
system. Any such member shall notify the board of trustees of each retirement system
not later than December 31, 2002 2026, or within 90 days after first becoming a member
of this retirement system, or within 90 days after entering service in a covered position,
whichever date is later."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, only if it is determined to have been
concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, the "Public Retirement Systems Standards Law"; otherwise, this Act shall not
become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2026, as
required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 900
- 2 -